Utah statutes.
54-15-108.   Damages and fines for connecting a customer generation system
to more than one customer.
If an independent energy producer defined in Subsection 54-2-1(13) that is
supplying energy to a customer under Subsection 54-2-1(16)(d)(iv) violates the
limitations set forth in Subsection 54-2-1(16)(d)(iv)(B), the commission may:
(1)  award damages to an electrical corporation for actual and consequential
damages to the electrical corporation; and
(2)  assess a fine against the independent energy producer or person
responsible for the violation.
